Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB774.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3735(a) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 3735. Homicide by vehicle while driving under influence.(a) Offense defined.--* * *(4) If a person is convicted under this section and the offense resulted in the death of a parent or legal guardian of a child under 18 years of age or a dependent, the sentencing court shall order the person to pay restitution in the form of financial support to each of the deceased victim's minor children or dependents, in accordance with this paragraph. The following shall apply:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) The sentencing court shall order the defendant to pay restitution in an amount that is reasonable and necessary for the financial support of the child or dependent until:(A) the child or dependent reaches 18 years of age; or(B) the child or dependent reaches 19 years of age if the child or dependent is pursuing an accredited course of instruction leading to the acquisition of a high school diploma or its equivalent.(ii) In determining the amount that is reasonable and necessary for the financial support of the decedent's child or dependent, the sentencing court shall consider all relevant factors, including:(A) The financial needs and resources of the child or dependent.(B) The financial needs and resources of the surviving parent or legal guardian of the child or dependent.(C) The child's or dependent's physical and legal custody arrangements.(D) If the child or dependent is in the custody of a county agency, as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303(a) (relating to definitions) or a comparable agency in another state, the financial resources and needs incurred regarding the custody of the child.(E) The standard of living to which the child or dependent was accustomed to prior to the decedent's death.20250SB0774PN0831 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) The physical and emotional condition of the child or dependent and the child's or dependent's educational needs.(G) The reasonable work-related child care expenses of the surviving parent or legal guardian.(iii) Restitution shall be paid to the surviving parent or legal guardian of the child or dependent or the sentencing court may order that payments made to financially support the child or dependent be made to the clerk of court as trustee for remittance to the surviving parent or legal guardian. The clerk shall remit the payments to the surviving parent or legal guardian within 10 working days of receipt by the clerk and the clerk shall deposit all payments no later than the next working day after receipt.(iv) If a person who is ordered to pay restitution to financially support a child or dependent under this section is incarcerated and unable to pay the required restitution, the person shall have up to one year after the release from incarceration to begin payment, including entering a payment plan to address any arrearage. If a person's financial support payments are set to terminate but the person's obligation is not paid in full, the financial support payments shall continue until the entire arrearage is paid.(v) If the surviving parent or legal guardian of the child or dependent brings a civil action against the person prior to the sentencing court ordering financial support payments as restitution and the surviving parent or legal guardian obtains a judgment in the civil suit, 20250SB0774PN0831 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 no restitution in the form of financial support shall be ordered under this section.(vi) If the sentencing court orders the person to pay restitution in the form of financial support payments under this section and the surviving parent or legal guardian subsequently brings a civil action and obtains a judgment, the financial support restitution order shall be offset by the amount of the judgment awarded in the civil action.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0774PN0831 - 4 - 1234567891011